Maryland, session 2025, HB1174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
25–102.
This title applies only in Montgomery County.
25–903.
(a) There is a Class BD–BWL license.
(b) The license authorizes the license holder to sell:
(1) beer and wine for on– or off–premises consumption; and
(2) liquor for on–premises consumption.
(c) As a prerequisite for the initial issuance of the license, the owner of the
establishment shall attest in a sworn statement that food will be available for sale for
on–premises consumption during the hours that alcoholic beverages are permitted to be
served.
(d) As a prerequisite for each renewal of the license, the owner of the
establishment shall attest in a sworn statement that food will be available for sale for
on–premises consumption during the hours that alcoholic beverages are permitted to be
served.
(e) The Board by regulation shall specify the type of food that is required to be
available for sale for on–premises consumption during the hours that alcoholic beverages
are permitted to be served.
(f) (1) A holder of a Class BD–BWL license:

HOUSE BILL 1174 3
[(1)] (I) may also hold a Class 7 micro–brewery license issued for a
location in the county; but
[(2)] (II) may not hold more than [one] TWO Class BD–BWL [license]
LICENSES.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IF A
PERSON HOLDS MORE THAN ONE CLASS BD–BWL LICENSE, THE SECOND CLASS
BD–BWL LICENSE THAT IS ISSUED TO THE HOLDER AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO
SELL, ON THE PREMISES DESCRIBED IN THE SECOND LICENSE:
(I) BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR FOR ON–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION; AND
(II) ONLY PRIVATE–LABEL PRODUCTS MANUFACTURED
EXCLUSIVELY FOR THE HOLDER FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(g) IF A PERSON HOLDS TWO CLASS BD–BWL LICENSES UNDER
SUBSECTION (F)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE ESTABLISHMENT FOR WHICH THE
SECOND CLASS BD–BWL LICENSE IS ISSUED SHALL HAVE AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS
FROM THE SALE OF FOOD THAT EXCEED THE AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS FROM THE
SALE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES.
(H) The annual license fee is $3,500.
25–1503.
Multiple licenses may be issued for the same premises or to an individual for the use
of that individual, a partnership, a corporation, an unincorporated association, or a limited
liability company if:
(1) (I) the licenses are Class H beer and wine licenses; and
[(2)] (II) each premises is a restaurant in a bowling establishment that
has at least 30 lanes with automatic pinsetters; OR
(2) THE LICENSES ARE CLASS BD–BWL LICENSES.
25–1614.
(a) Except as provided in § 25–1615 of this subtitle, the Board may not authorize
the same license holder to hold more than 10 licenses.
(b) The 10 licenses that may be held by the same license holder:

HOUSE BILL 1174
(1) may include:
(i) one or more Class H–BW licenses; and
(ii) one or more Class B–K licenses; and
(2) may not include more than [one] TWO Class BD–BWL [license]
LICENSES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.